Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 6 Services for the Aging

Cross references.

Rights of persons residing in long-term care facilities generally, § 31-8-100 et seq.

Powers and duties of Department of Human Services and county departments of family and children services regarding public assistance to the aged, §

49-4-30

et seq.